ca/dictionaries/ca-valencia.aff
FLAG long
SFX _B Y 46
SFX _B ès és/_v_Y ès
SFX _B t da t
SFX _B u va u
SFX _B c ga c
SFX _B 0 sa [^àèéíòóú]s
SFX _B às assa às
SFX _B ès essa ès
SFX _B és essa és
SFX _B ís issa [^aeou]ís
SFX _B ís ïssa [aeo]ís
SFX _B ís issa [gq]uís
SFX _B ís ïssa [^gq]uís
SFX _B òs ossa òs
SFX _B ós ossa ós
SFX _B ús ussa [^aeoi]ús
SFX _B ús üssa [aeoi]ús
SFX _B 0 s t
SFX _B 0 s u
SFX _B 0 s c
SFX _B 0 sos [^àèéíòóú]s
SFX _B às assos às
SFX _B ès essos ès
SFX _B és essos és
SFX _B ís issos [^aeou]ís
SFX _B ís ïssos [aeo]ís
SFX _B ís issos [gq]uís
SFX _B ís ïssos [^gq]uís
SFX _B òs ossos òs
SFX _B ós ossos ós
SFX _B ús ussos [^aeoi]ús
SFX _B ús üssos [aeoi]ús
SFX _B t des t
SFX _B u ves u
SFX _B c gues c
SFX _B 0 ses [^àèéíòóú]s
SFX _B às asses às
SFX _B ès esses ès
SFX _B és esses és
SFX _B ís isses [^aeou]ís
SFX _B ís ïsses [aeo]ís
SFX _B ís isses [gq]uís
SFX _B ís ïsses [^gq]uís
SFX _B òs osses òs
SFX _B ós osses ós
SFX _B ús usses [^aeoi]ús
SFX _B ús üsses [aeoi]ús

SFX _H Y 34
SFX _H è é/_v_Y è
SFX _H 0 na [aeiou]
SFX _H à ana à
SFX _H è ena è
SFX _H é ena é
SFX _H í ina [^aeou]í
SFX _H í ina [gq]uí
SFX _H í ïna [^gq]uí
SFX _H í ïna [aeo]í
SFX _H ò ona ò
SFX _H ó ona ó
SFX _H ú una ú
SFX _H 0 ns [aeiou]
SFX _H à ans à
SFX _H è ens è
SFX _H é ens é
SFX _H í ins [^aeou]í
SFX _H í ins [gq]uí
SFX _H í ïns [^gq]uí
SFX _H í ïns [aeo]í
SFX _H ò ons ò
SFX _H ó ons ó
SFX _H ú uns ú
SFX _H 0 nes [aeiou]
SFX _H à anes à
SFX _H è enes è
SFX _H é enes é
SFX _H í ines [^aeou]í
SFX _H í ines [gq]uí
SFX _H í ïnes [^gq]uí
SFX _H í ïnes [aeo]í
SFX _H ò ones ò
SFX _H ó ones ó
SFX _H ú unes ú

SFX _J Y 29
SFX _J ès és/_v_Y ès
SFX _J 0 a [^s]
SFX _J 0 a [^àèéíòóú]s
SFX _J às asa às
SFX _J ès esa ès
SFX _J és esa és
SFX _J ís isa ís
SFX _J òs osa òs
SFX _J ós osa ós
SFX _J ús usa ús
SFX _J 0 os [^s]
SFX _J 0 os [^àèéíòóú]s
SFX _J às asos às
SFX _J ès esos ès
SFX _J és esos és
SFX _J ís isos ís
SFX _J òs osos òs
SFX _J ós osos ós
SFX _J ús usos ús
SFX _J 0 es [^sç]
SFX _J ç ces ç
SFX _J 0 es [^àèéíòóú]s
SFX _J às ases às
SFX _J ès eses ès
SFX _J és eses és
SFX _J ís ises ís
SFX _J òs oses òs
SFX _J ós oses ós
SFX _J ús uses ús

SFX _K Y 25
SFX _K ari ària ari
SFX _K aci àcia aci
SFX _K adi àdia adi
SFX _K ori òria ori
SFX _K emi èmia emi
SFX _K oli òlia oli
SFX _K ogen ògena ogen
SFX _K ogin ògina ogin
SFX _K òleg òloga òleg
SFX _K eu ea eu
SFX _K ani ània ani
SFX _K 0 s [aeioug]
SFX _K ogen ògens ogen
SFX _K ogin ògins ogin
SFX _K ari àries ari
SFX _K adi àdies adi
SFX _K aci àcies aci
SFX _K ori òries ori
SFX _K emi èmies emi
SFX _K oli òlies oli
SFX _K ogen ògenes ogen
SFX _K ogin ògines ogin
SFX _K òleg òlogues òleg
SFX _K eu ees eu
SFX _K ani ànies ani

SFX _L Y 19
SFX _L ini ínia ini
SFX _L igi ígia igi
SFX _L igin ígina igin
SFX _L igen ígena igen
SFX _L agen àgena agen
SFX _L umen úmena umen
SFX _L ici ícia ici
SFX _L 0 s i
SFX _L igin ígins igin
SFX _L igen ígens igen
SFX _L agen àgens agen
SFX _L umen úmens umen
SFX _L ini ínies ini
SFX _L igi ígies igi
SFX _L igin ígines igin
SFX _L igen ígenes igen
SFX _L agen àgenes agen
SFX _L umen úmenes umen
SFX _L ici ícies ici

PFX _V N 60
PFX _V 0 l' [1aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
PFX _V 0 L' [1aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
PFX _V 0 l' [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX _V 0 L' [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX _V 0 s' [aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
PFX _V 0 S' [aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
PFX _V 0 s' [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX _V 0 S' [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX _V a l'A a
PFX _V a L'A a
PFX _V a s'A a
PFX _V a S'A a
PFX _V à l'À à
PFX _V à L'À à
PFX _V à s'À à
PFX _V à S'À à
PFX _V e l'E e
PFX _V e L'E e
PFX _V e s'E e
PFX _V e S'E e
PFX _V è l'È è
PFX _V è L'È è
PFX _V è s'È è
PFX _V è S'È è
PFX _V é l'É é
PFX _V é L'É é
PFX _V é s'É é
PFX _V é S'É é
PFX _V i l'I i
PFX _V i L'I i
PFX _V i s'I i
PFX _V i S'I i
PFX _V í l'Í í
PFX _V í L'Í í
PFX _V í s'Í í
PFX _V í S'Í í
PFX _V o l'O o
PFX _V o L'O o
PFX _V o s'O o
PFX _V o S'O o
PFX _V ò l'Ò ò
PFX _V ò L'Ò ò
PFX _V ò s'Ò ò
PFX _V ò S'Ò ò
PFX _V ó l'Ó ó
PFX _V ó L'Ó ó
PFX _V ó s'Ó ó
PFX _V ó S'Ó ó
PFX _V u l'U u
PFX _V u L'U u
PFX _V u s'U u
PFX _V u S'U u
PFX _V ú l'Ú ú
PFX _V ú L'Ú ú
PFX _V ú s'Ú ú
PFX _V ú S'Ú ú
PFX _V h l'H h
PFX _V h L'H h
PFX _V h s'H h
PFX _V h S'H h

PFX _v Y 30
PFX _v 0 l' [1aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
PFX _v 0 L' [1aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
PFX _v 0 l' [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX _v 0 L' [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX _v a l'A a
PFX _v a L'A a
PFX _v à l'À à
PFX _v à L'À à
PFX _v e l'E e
PFX _v e L'E e
PFX _v è l'È è
PFX _v è L'È è
PFX _v é l'É é
PFX _v é L'É é
PFX _v i l'I i
PFX _v i L'I i
PFX _v í l'Í í
PFX _v í L'Í í
PFX _v o l'O o
PFX _v o L'O o
PFX _v ò l'Ò ò
PFX _v ò L'Ò ò
PFX _v ó l'Ó ó
PFX _v ó L'Ó ó
PFX _v u l'U u
PFX _v u L'U u
PFX _v ú l'Ú ú
PFX _v ú L'Ú ú
PFX _v h l'H h
PFX _v h L'H h

PFX _W N 4
PFX _W 0 n' [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX _W 0 l' [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX _W 0 N' [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX _W 0 L' [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]

PFX _Y Y 28
PFX _Y 0 d' [1aàeèéiíoòóhuúAÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX _Y 0 D' [1aàeèéiíoòóhuúAÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX _Y a d'A a
PFX _Y a D'A a
PFX _Y à d'À à
PFX _Y à D'À à
PFX _Y e d'E e
PFX _Y e D'E e
PFX _Y è d'È è
PFX _Y è D'È è
PFX _Y é d'É é
PFX _Y é D'É é
PFX _Y i d'I i
PFX _Y i D'I i
PFX _Y í d'Í í
PFX _Y í D'Í í
PFX _Y o d'O o
PFX _Y o D'O o
PFX _Y ò d'Ò ò
PFX _Y ò D'Ò ò
PFX _Y ó d'Ó ó
PFX _Y ó D'Ó ó
PFX _Y u d'U u
PFX _Y u D'U u
PFX _Y ú d'Ú ú
PFX _Y ú D'Ú ú
PFX _Y h d'H h
PFX _Y h D'H h

PFX _Z Y 5
PFX _Z 0 n' [aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
PFX _Z 0 m' [aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
PFX _Z 0 t' [aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
PFX _Z 0 s' [aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
PFX _Z 0 l' [aàeèéiíoòóhuú]

# Model de conjugació: cantar, sense apostrofació inicial
SFX 00 Y 84
SFX 00 r r/_C ar
SFX 00 r nt/_C ar
SFX 00 r t/ ar
SFX 00 r da/ ar
SFX 00 r ts/ ar
SFX 00 r des/ ar
SFX 00 ar o/ ar
SFX 00 ar e/ ar
SFX 00 ar 0/ ar
SFX 00 ar es/ ar
SFX 00 r 0/ ar
SFX 00 ar em/ ar
SFX 00 r m/ ar
SFX 00 ar eu/ ar
SFX 00 r u/ ar
SFX 00 ar en/ ar
SFX 00 r va/ ar
SFX 00 r ves/ ar
SFX 00 r va/ ar
SFX 00 ar àvem/ ar
SFX 00 ar àveu/ ar
SFX 00 r ven/ ar
SFX 00 ar í/ ar
SFX 00 r res/ ar
SFX 00 ar à/ ar
SFX 00 ar àrem/ ar
SFX 00 ar àreu/ ar
SFX 00 r ren/ ar
SFX 00 r ré/ ar
SFX 00 r ràs/ ar
SFX 00 r rà/ ar
SFX 00 r rem/ ar
SFX 00 r reu/ ar
SFX 00 r ran/ ar
SFX 00 r ria/ ar
SFX 00 r ries/ ar
SFX 00 r ria/ ar
SFX 00 r ríem/ ar
SFX 00 r ríeu/ ar
SFX 00 r rien/ ar
SFX 00 ar e/ ar
SFX 00 ar i/ ar
SFX 00 ar es/ ar
SFX 00 ar is/ ar
SFX 00 ar e/ ar
SFX 00 ar i/ ar
SFX 00 ar em/ ar
SFX 00 ar eu/ ar
SFX 00 ar en/ ar
SFX 00 ar in/ ar
SFX 00 ar és/ ar
SFX 00 r ra/ ar
SFX 00 ar às/ ar
SFX 00 ar essis/ ar
SFX 00 r res/ ar
SFX 00 r ssis/ ar
SFX 00 ar esses/ ar
SFX 00 r sses/ ar
SFX 00 ar és/ ar
SFX 00 r ra/ ar
SFX 00 ar às/ ar
SFX 00 ar éssim/ ar
SFX 00 ar àrem/ ar
SFX 00 ar àssim/ ar
SFX 00 ar éssem/ ar
SFX 00 ar àssem/ ar
SFX 00 ar éssiu/ ar
SFX 00 ar àreu/ ar
SFX 00 ar àssiu/ ar
SFX 00 ar ésseu/ ar
SFX 00 ar àsseu/ ar
SFX 00 ar essin/ ar
SFX 00 r ren/ ar
SFX 00 r ssin/ ar
SFX 00 ar essen/ ar
SFX 00 r ssen/ ar
SFX 00 r 0/_D ar
SFX 00 ar e/_D ar
SFX 00 ar i/_D ar
SFX 00 ar em/_C ar
SFX 00 r u/_C ar
SFX 00 ar eu/_C ar
SFX 00 ar en/_C ar
SFX 00 ar in/_C ar
