ca/dictionaries/ca-valencia.dic
Altair/_Y_V
Amiens/_Y_V
Auremunds/_Y
Enewetak/_Y_V
Herundina/_Y_V
Oliver/_Y_V
Urawa/_Y_V
absoldre/_v_Y_D
absorbible/_E_V_Y
abstendrien/_Z
abstreure/_v_Y_D
acantopterigi/_L_V_Y
acaronament/_E_V_Y
acolliríeu/_Z
acomboiat/_v_Y
acomplexat/_B_V_Y
acovardiment/_E_V_Y
actant/_E_V_Y
acudin/_Z
acudir/_v_Y_C
adelofici/_L_V_Y
adir/_v_Y_C
adiríeu/_Z
adrenocorticotiroidal/_E_V_Y
advenguda/_v_Y
aeris/_Y
afaenem/_Z
afocat/_B_V_Y
afrancesant/_v_Y_C
afroeuropeu/_K_V_Y
aglòssia/_E_V_Y
agnatici/_L_V_Y
agomboïn/_Z
agraïment/_E_V_Y
agredolç/_J_V_Y
aiguabatre/_v_Y_D
alabatut/_v_Y
alcalimètric/_F_V_Y
alcohòlic/_F_V_Y
alfafarí/_H_V_Y
alternària/_E_V_Y
alumag/_E_V_Y
alveolat/_B_V_Y
al·lotigen/_L_V_Y
amanós/_J_V_Y
amfitriona/_V_Y
amiant/_E_V_Y
anatomopatòleg/_K_V_Y
anaves/_Z
ancoratge/_E_V_Y
andesina/_E_V_Y
angiocrí/_H_V_Y
anorexigen/_L_V_Y
anquiloquília/_E_V_Y
anserina/_V_Y
antiedematós/_J_V_Y
antiparlamentari/_K_V_Y
antiparlamentària/_V_Y
antipedicular/_E_V_Y
antitussigen/_L_V_Y
aparéixer/_v_Y_C
apendiculat/_B_V_Y
apersonat/_B_V_Y
apetitosa/_V_Y
aprehenia/_Z
apressat/_v_Y
aranès/_J_V_Y
ardènica/_V_Y
arenífera/_V_Y
ari/_K_V_Y
arnsbergià/_H_V_Y
arrasàrem/_Z
arremetent/_v_Y_C
arronyacat/_B_V_Y
arsènica/_V_Y
artesunat/_E_V_Y
asseure/_v_Y_D
astor/_E_V_Y
astuciós/_J_V_Y
asèpal/_F_V_Y
atalaien/_Z
atracada/_v_Y
atreia/_Z
atziac/_B_V_Y
autentificada/_V_Y
autodepuració/_G_V_Y
autodissolt/_v_Y
autoinculpatori/_K_V_Y
avortista/_E_V_Y
aïnada/_v_Y
aïnava/_Z
barcelonès/_J
bateà/_H
bebrici/_L
becgroc/_B
biafrès/_J
bigordà/_H
bipinnatipartit/_B
blasmar/00
boreomediterrani/_K
botswanès/_J
burundès/_J
cabestrar/00
cabrú/_H
callat/_B
camarguès/_J
cancerigen/_L
carbonitrurar/00
carlí/_H
caseós/_J
catamenogen/_K
catenulat/_B
cinnabarí/_H
cirrós/_J
clavar/00
clavari/_K
coccigi/_L
col·laboratiu/_B
col·lagen/_L
compartimentar/00
comunicòleg/_K
conquès/_J
consentit/_B
conservar/00
convulsionari/_K
coquitzar/00
coral·ligen/_L
cortesà/_H
costerut/_B
cromós/_J
curar/00
decretori/_K
deliberatiu/_B
demonitzar/00
desalbardar/00
desbastar/00
descompilar/00
desconcertat/_B
desembarrar/00
desempolvorar/00
desendollar/00
desenseuar/00
desfilar/00
desinfestar/00
desopilatiu/_B
despolpar/00
destil·latori/_K
diastasigen/_L
dinyar/00
discriminatiu/_B
diví/_H
drupaci/_K
eberthitis/_V_Y
electiu/_B_V_Y
electroestàtica/_V_Y
eleusini/_L_V_Y
elogiós/_J_V_Y
embeguda/_v_Y
embrionari/_K_V_Y
emetéssem/_Z
emmorenidor/_F_V_Y
empavesant/_v_Y_C
empesàssiu/_Z
empényer/_v_Y_C
encendre/_v_Y_D
encenia/_Z
encondrosi/_E_V_Y
encuriosit/_B_V_Y
endodontòleg/_K_V_Y
enfaenar/_v_Y_C
enfaenés/_Z
enfugida/_v_Y
engrandida/_V_Y
enjoiés/_Z
entravessant/_v_Y_C
entravessàs/_Z
entrebadada/_V_Y
entrelluíeu/_Z
entreobert/_v_Y
entresentien/_Z
entreverat/_B_V_Y
entreveure/_v_Y_D
entreveuries/_Z
enèrgicament/_Y_V
esbatéssim/_Z
escada/_v_Y
escanyadissa/_V_Y
esclafit/_E_V_Y
escolrit/_B_V_Y
escometo/_Z
escruixit/_v_Y
esdevengueu/_Z
esgarrinxós/_J_V_Y
espaiarem/_Z
espartà/_H_V_Y
espasmogen/_K_V_Y
espelta/_E_V_Y
espenyent/_v_Y_C
espingarda/_E_V_Y
esponsalici/_L_V_Y
espremen/_Z
estar/_v_Y_C
estesaríeu/_Z
estevat/_B_V_Y
estirè/_G_V_Y
estrabisme/_E_V_Y
estrenyeren/_Z
estès/_v_Y
etruscòleg/_K_V_Y
exobiologia/_E_V_Y
exornació/_G_V_Y
expens/_Z
exsotssecretari/_K_V_Y
extreta/_v_Y
facciós/_J
factici/_L
feixí/_H
fibrinogen/_K
filoguiat/_B
fluorar/00
fol·liculós/_J
frenosecretori/_K
frigorigen/_L
gambià/_H
gestatori/_K
glamurós/_J
granissolar/00
groguissó/_H
groguís/_B
guarentigi/_L
hau/_Z
hepatocarcinogen/_K_V_Y
hepatomacròsia/_E_V_Y
heteròleg/_K_V_Y
hipobromós/_J_V_Y
hipocromàtic/_F_V_Y
honorari/_E_V_Y
huit-centè/_H
idogen/_K_V_Y
immensurabilitat/_E_Y
incoatiu/_B_V_Y
incomplires/_Z
indòleg/_K_V_Y
ingressant/_v_Y_C
ingènit/_F_V_Y
iniop/_E_V_Y
iniquitós/_J_V_Y
interdigues/_Z
interpolatiu/_B_V_Y
intersegmentari/_K_V_Y
iridià/_H_V_Y
isosista/_E_Y
isquiococcigi/_L_V_Y
judiciari/_K
lagrangià/_H
lamentós/_J
libifenici/_L
limfocitari/_K
lliurar/00
logudorès/_J
longilini/_L
loriguillà/_H
malairat/_B
masculí/_H
melindrós/_J
metoditzar/00
mirambellà/_H
mixtilini/_L
modificatori/_K
multidentat/_B
murrí/_H
natalici/_L
nebulós/_J
noranta-unè/_H
noòleg/_K
obliquat/_v_Y
obreptici/_L_V_Y
obtinguésseu/_Z
octaèdric/_F_V_Y
oferta/_v_Y
ominós/_J_V_Y
operacionalisme/_E_V_Y
ordenessen/_Z
orquioncus/_V_Y
ovigen/_L_V_Y
oxidatiu/_B_V_Y
palatostafilí/_H
palpitar/00
panteòleg/_K
perifistulós/_J
perigin/_L
perigordí/_H
planoperennifoli/_K
plançonar/00
politicoadministratiu/_B
ponentí/_H
pontifici/_L
poregós/_J
protocol·lari/_K
punxegut/_B
punxonar/00
quaranta-huitè/_H
queratinós/_J
receptici/_L
recomptar/00
relativitzar/00
reproductiu/_B
respiratori/_K
retrumfar/00
reu/_K
rocós/_J
romà/_H
sacarigen/_L
saragossà/_H
segarrès/_J
senzillar/00
sericigen/_L
setanta-quatrè/_H
signatari/_K
sobrequalificat/_B
subespinós/_J
submarí/_H
subministrar/00
subreptici/_L
terciari/_K
teresà/_H
ters/_J
tetragen/_L
tournaisià/_H
trampelar/00
transpositiu/_B
tribunici/_L
tumorigen/_L
txetxè/_H
udmurt/_E_V_Y
ullerós/_J_V_Y
ullprenent/_v_Y_C
urogen/_K_V_Y
vegà/_H
verotoxigen/_L
vertebrar/00
vilipendiós/_J
vomitiu/_B
xativí/_H
àtic/_E_V_Y
